Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 11 Employment Offices and Agencies
11-11-223. Judicial review of director's administrative orders.

If the Director of the Division of Labor refuses to grant a license, suspends or revokes a license that has been granted, or imposes an administrative fine as provided in §§ 11-11-213, 11-11-221, and 11-11-222, the person adversely affected or aggrieved by the order of the director issued pursuant to the provisions of §§ 11-11-221 and 11-11-222 may obtain a review of the order.

The order may be brought in the circuit court in the judicial district in which the violation is alleged to have occurred, where the employment agent, manager, or counselor worked, or in the Pulaski County Circuit Court or, if the aggrieved person is a nonresident of the state, in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

The review may be obtained by filing in the court within thirty (30) days following the issuance of the order a written petition praying that the order be modified or set aside.

A copy of the petition shall be forthwith transmitted by the clerk of the court to the Division of Labor.

Thereupon, the division shall file in the court the record of proceedings before the division.

Upon the filing, the court shall have jurisdiction of the proceedings and of the questions determined therein and shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in the record a decree affirming, modifying, or setting aside, in whole or in part, the order of the director and enforcing the same to the extent that the order is affirmed.

Commencement of proceedings under this section shall not, unless ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the order of the director.

No objection which has not been urged before the director shall be considered by the court.

The findings of the director with respect to questions of fact, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive.

If any party shall apply to the court for leave to adduce additional evidence and shall show to the satisfaction of the court that the additional evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to adduce the evidence in the hearing before the director, the court may order the additional evidence to be taken before the director and made a part of the record.

The director may modify his or her findings as to the facts or make new findings, by reason of additional evidence so taken and filed, and the director shall file the modified or new findings with the court.

The findings with respect to questions of fact, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive.

Upon the filing of the record with it, the jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive, and its judgment and decree shall be final, except that it shall be subject to review by the Supreme Court.

The division shall certify the record of its proceedings if the party commencing the proceedings shall pay to it the cost of preparing and certifying the records, including the recording and transcribing of all testimony introduced in the proceedings.

If payment of the costs of preparing and certifying the records, including the recording and transcribing of all testimony introduced in the proceedings, is not made by the party commencing the proceedings for review within ten (10) days after notice from the division of the cost of preparing and certifying the record, the circuit court in which the proceeding is pending, on motion of the director, shall dismiss the petition.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1026; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5391-5393.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (c)(2)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2)(B) twice and in (i)(1).

11-11-224. Deceptive practices.

No employment agent shall publish or cause to be published any fraudulent or misleading notice or advertisement of the employment agency by means of cards, circulars, or signs or in newspapers or other publications.

All letterheads, receipts, and blanks shall contain the full name and address of the employment agency, and the licensee shall state in all notices and advertisements the fact that the licensee is or conducts a private employment agency.

No employment agency shall print, publish, or paint on any sign or window or insert in any newspaper or publication a name similar to that of the Arkansas State Employment Service or any other governmental agency.

No employment agency shall print or stamp on any receipt or on any contract used by the agency any part of this subchapter unless the entire section from which the part is taken is printed or stamped thereon.

No employment agency shall allow any person in its employment to use any names other than their legal names in the course of and in respect to their employment with the agency.

No employment agency or its employees or agents shall give any information or make any representation to any applicant, where the agency or its employees or agents know or reasonably should know that the information or representation is false.

No employment agency or its employees or agents shall knowingly withhold from a job applicant any information material to a job to which that applicant is referred.

No employment agent or its agents or employees shall engage in any conduct in the course of its business that constitutes a fraudulent, dishonest, or deceptive practice, whether or not the conduct is prohibited by this subchapter.

No contracts, forms, or schedules used by employment agencies in their dealings with the public shall contain any false, ambiguous, or misleading information.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1027.

11-11-225. Miscellaneous restrictions and requirements.

In addition to other provisions of this subchapter, the following provisions shall govern each and every employment agency:

Every employment agent or agency shall display his, her, or its license in a conspicuous place in the main office of the agency. Managers and counselors shall display their licenses in a conspicuous place in their offices or work areas;

All advertising by an employment agency of any form or kind shall include the words “employment agency” or “personnel agency”.

Advertising for an employment position with the agency itself shall clearly convey the information that the job position offered is with the employment agency publishing the advertisement;

No employment agency or its agents or employees shall receive or require any applicant to execute any power of attorney, assignment of wages or salary, or note authorizing the confession of judgment;

No employment agent, by himself or herself, or by his or her agents or employees, shall solicit, persuade, or induce any employee to leave any employment in which the employment agent or his or her agent has placed the employee, nor shall any employment agency or any of its agents or employees solicit, persuade, or induce any employer to discharge any employee, nor shall any employment agent, or his or her agents or employees, divide or offer to divide or share directly or indirectly any fee, charge, or compensation received, or to be received, from an employee with any employer or persons in any way connected with the business thereof;

No employment agent by himself or herself or by his or her agents or employees shall give or promise to give anything of intrinsic value to any employer or applicant for employment as an inducement to use the services of his or her employment agency.

No fee shall be solicited or accepted as an application or registration fee by an employment agent for the purpose of registering any person as an applicant for employment;

No employment agency or its agents or employees shall advertise or make a referral for any job position without having first obtained a bona fide job order therefor;

No employment agency or its agents or employees shall refer an applicant for a job or job interview unless the applicant has been personally interviewed by the employment agency or its agents or employees or has corresponded with the employment agency with the specific purpose of securing employment through that employment agency;

Every employment agency shall inform the public by a conspicuous sign or poster that the employment agency is subject to the requirements of this subchapter, which is administered and enforced by the Division of Labor.

The division shall prepare and distribute the sign or poster to be used by agencies to comply with this subdivision (8);

No employment agency or its agents or employees shall knowingly send an applicant to any place where a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute exists;

No agency shall use any trade name or business identity similar to, or reasonably likely to be confused with, the trade name or business identity of an existing agency or any governmental nonprofit employment agency;

No employment agency shall refer an applicant to a situation, employment, or occupation prohibited by law;

No employment agency shall charge a fee to an employee for any services other than actual placement of an applicant;

No employment agency shall charge an applicant a fee for accepting employment with the employment agency or any subsidiary of that agency;

Any information regarding an applicant's background or credit, from whatever source obtained, shall be used for no purpose other than assisting the applicant in securing employment. However, an employment agency may use background and credit information regarding an applicant in determining whether to conduct placement services for the applicant if the applicant gives written authorization for securing the information and understands the purpose for which the information is secured;

No employment agency or its agents or employees shall engage in any practice that discriminates against any person on the basis of race, color, sex, age, religion, or national origin;

Under no circumstances shall more than one (1) fee for any one (1) placement be charged any applicant;

No contracts, forms, or schedules used by employment agencies shall contain any provisions in conflict with the provisions of this subchapter; and

All refunds due shall be made by the agency by cash, check, or money order promptly when due.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1028; Acts 1995, No. 283, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5394.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (8)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (8)(B).

11-11-226. Designation of manager required.

Every employment agency shall designate an agency manager at each office location of that agency, who shall be responsible for the general management, administration, and operation of that office location.

The agency manager must comply with the licensing requirements of §§ 11-11-210 — 11-11-212, 11-11-214, 11-11-217, 11-11-218, 11-11-220(a)(1) and (b), and 11-11-226.

Every employment agency must maintain an agency manager at each of its office locations.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1017.

11-11-227. Fee restrictions and requirements.

When employment lasts less than ninety (90) calendar days, regardless of the reason, no employment agency may charge an employee a fee of more than one-ninetieth (1/90th) of the permanent placement fee for each calendar day of the employment. Under no circumstances shall the fee exceed twenty percent (20%) of an employee's actual gross earnings if employment lasts less than thirty (30) days or forty percent (40%) of an employee's actual gross earnings if employment lasts more than thirty (30) days but less than ninety (90) days.

When a promissory note is used by the agency, it shall be clearly identified as such and shall not be executed until the placement is made.

The defense of no or insufficient consideration shall be good as against a holder of any such employment agency fee note.

When a dispute concerning a fee exists, the Division of Labor may conduct an investigation to determine all of the facts concerning the dispute. Thereafter, the Director of the Division of Labor shall issue a decision and order resolving the dispute.

Any person aggrieved by this decision and order may obtain review of this decision and order pursuant to § 11-11-222.

Any schedule of fees to be charged by an employment agency for its services shall be furnished to all applicants upon making application with the agency.

The forms, fee schedules, and contracts utilized by an employment agency shall contain no ambiguous, false, or misleading information.

No contract or fee schedule shall contain smaller than eight-point type.

All fee schedules used in the business of an employment agency must be furnished to job applicants and fee-paying employers and shall state in dollars and cents the amount of any fee charged by the agency for its services.

Percentages shall not be used by agencies in schedules of fees to be charged for their services, except when the annual salary for a job is twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) or more.

It shall be unlawful for any employment agency to impose, enforce, collect, or receive a fee for performance of any service for a job applicant, or for a prospective employer, unless the agency makes every reasonable effort to disclose the exact dollar amount of the fee to the applicant or prospective employer prior to commencement of employment of an applicant by an employer.

Nothing in this section or this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit an employment agency from contracting with an employer on a fee-paid basis to pay the fee for the placement services for an employee without an actual job placement or to prohibit an agency from charging a fee to an employer for a retained services contract to search for applicants for an employer without an actual job placement.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1024; Acts 1995, No. 283, § 2;
2019, No. 910, § 5395.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” and “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (c)(1).

11-11-228. Filing of fee schedule, forms, and contracts required.

It shall be the duty of every employment agency to file with the Division of Labor a schedule of all fees, charges, and commissions that the agency expects to charge and collect for its service, together with a copy of all forms and contracts to be used in dealings with the public in the operation of its business.

The fee schedules, contracts, and forms shall be filed with the division on the date of the agency's application for initial or renewal licensing under this subchapter.

Any amendments or supplements to fee schedules, contracts, or forms filed with the division must be filed at least fifteen (15) days before the amendment or supplement is to become effective.

It shall be unlawful for any employment agency to charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater compensation for any service performed by the agency than is specified in fee schedules filed with the division or than is specified by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1024; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5396.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

11-11-229. Records required.

It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a complete record of all orders for employees that are received from prospective employers. This record shall contain the date when the order was received, the name and address of the employer seeking the services of an employee, the name of the individual placing the order, the duties of the position to be filled, the qualifications required of the employee, the salary or wages to be paid, and the probable duration of the job.

It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a complete record of each applicant who is referred by the agency to an employer for a job interview. This record shall contain the date when the applicant was referred to a prospective employer for a job or interview, the name of the applicant, and the name of the firm to whom the applicant is referred.

It shall be the duty of every employment agency to keep a complete register called a “business transaction record”, which shall consist of the name of the individual placed, the date of the placement, the name of the employer, the starting date of the position, the starting salary, the amount of the fee charged, and the remarks column.

The remarks column will state the amount of any adjustment or refund made.

Prior to referral of any person to a job or interview or prior to placement of any job advertisement, an employment agency must have a current bona fide job order.

It shall be the duty of every employment agency to maintain a copy of any job advertisement and the job order pertaining to any advertisement in a readily available record.

All of the records listed in this section shall be kept in the employment agency office and shall be open during office hours to inspection by the Division of Labor and its duly authorized agents.

No employment agent or his or her employee shall knowingly make any false entry or omission in the records.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 493, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1023; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5397.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (e).